Texas statutes.
AGRICULTURE CODE

TITLE 3. AGRICULTURAL RESEARCH AND PROMOTION

CHAPTER 48. AGRICULTURAL PROJECTS IN CERTAIN URBAN SCHOOLS

Sec. 48.001. CREATION. (a) Consistent with this chapter, the department by rule shall develop a program to award grants to public elementary and middle schools located in large urban school districts for the purpose of establishing:

(1) demonstration agricultural projects; or

(2) other projects designed to foster an understanding and awareness of agriculture.

(b) The department may award a grant under this chapter to a nonprofit organization that partners with a school described by Subsection (a) to establish a project described by Subsection (a) at the school.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 975, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 9, Sec. 1, eff. April 11, 2001. Renumbered from Sec. 46.001 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(1), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1147 (S.B. 827), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 596 (S.B. 199), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 48.002. ELIGIBILITY. Subject to available funds, a public elementary or middle school, or a nonprofit organization that partners with the school, is eligible to receive a grant under this chapter if the school:

(1) is located in a school district with an enrollment of at least 49,000 students; and

(2) submits to the department, at the time and in the form required by the department, a proposal for a demonstration agricultural project that includes:

(A) a description of the proposed project;

(B) a schedule of projected costs for the project;

(C) a statement of the educational benefits of the project, including how the project will improve understanding of agriculture; and

(D) if a nonprofit organization is applying for the grant, a statement from the school that the nonprofit organization is partnering with the school.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 975, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 9, Sec. 2, eff. April 11, 2001. Renumbered from Sec. 46.002 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(1), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1147 (S.B. 827), Sec. 2, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 596 (S.B. 199), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 48.004. REPORT. A school or nonprofit organization that receives a grant under this chapter must report the results of the project to the department in a manner determined by the department.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 975, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999. Renumbered from Sec. 46.004 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(1), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 596 (S.B. 199), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 48.005. FUNDS. The department may solicit and accept gifts, grants, and other donations from any source to carry out this chapter.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 975, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999. Renumbered from Sec. 46.005 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(1), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.